Missouri, session 2026, SB1385.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.020, 287.021, 287.063, 287.067,
287.120, 287.127, 287.140, 287.150, 287.210, 287.220, 287.240,
287.250, 287.300, 287.420, 287.430, 287.480, 287.510, 287.530,
287.540, and 287.780, RSMo, are repealed and nineteen new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
287.020, 287.021, 287.063, 287.067, 287.120, 287.127, 287.140,
287.150, 287.210, 287.220, 287.240, 287.250, 287.300, 287.420,
287.430, 287.480, 287.510, 287.540, and 287.780, to read as
follows:
287.020. 1. The word "employee" as used in this
chapter shall be construed to mean every person in the
service of any employer, as defined in this chapter, under
any contract of hire, express or implied, oral or written,
or under any appointment or election, including executive
officers of corporations. Except as otherwise provided in
section 287.200, any reference to any employee who has been
injured shall, when the employee is dead, also include his
or her dependents, and other persons to whom compensation
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1385 2
may be payable. The word "employee" shall also include all
minors who work for an employer, whether or not such minors
are employed in violation of law, and all such minors are
hereby made of full age for all purposes under, in
connection with, or arising out of this chapter. The word
"employee" shall not include an individual who is the owner,
as defined in section 301.010, and operator of a motor
vehicle which is leased or contracted with a driver to a for-
hire motor carrier operating within a commercial zone as
defined in section 390.020 or 390.041, or operating under a
certificate issued by the Missouri department of
transportation or by the United States Department of
Transportation, or any of its subagencies. The word
"employee" also shall not include any person performing
services for board, lodging, aid, or sustenance received
from any religious, charitable, or relief organization.
2. The word "accident" as used in this chapter shall
mean [an unexpected] a traumatic event or unusual strain
identifiable by time and place of occurrence and producing
at the time objective symptoms of an injury caused by a
specific event during a single work shift. An injury is not
compensable because work was a triggering or precipitating
factor.
3. (1) In this chapter the term "injury" is hereby
defined to be an injury which has arisen out of and in the
course of employment. An injury by accident or occupational
disease is compensable only if the accident was the
prevailing factor in causing both the resulting medical
condition and disability. "The prevailing factor" is
defined to be the primary factor, in relation to [any] all
other [factor] factors combined, causing both the resulting
medical condition and disability.

SB 1385 3
(2) An injury by accident or occupational disease
shall be deemed to arise out of and in the course of the
employment only if:
(a) It is reasonably apparent, upon consideration of
all the circumstances, that the accident or occupational
disease is the prevailing factor in causing the injury; [and]
(b) It does not come from a hazard or risk unrelated
to the employment to which workers would have been equally
exposed outside of and unrelated to the employment in normal
nonemployment life; and
(c) The employee was engaged in a work activity to the
greater benefit of the employer when the occupational
disease was contracted or accident occurred.
(3) An injury resulting directly or indirectly from
idiopathic causes is not compensable.
(4) A cardiovascular, pulmonary, respiratory, or other
disease, or cerebrovascular accident or myocardial
infarction suffered by a worker is an injury only if the
accident is the prevailing factor in causing the resulting
medical condition.
(5) The terms "injury" and "personal injuries" shall
mean violence to the physical structure of the body and to
the personal property which is used to make up the physical
structure of the body, such as artificial dentures,
artificial limbs, glass eyes, eyeglasses, and other
prostheses which are placed in or on the body to replace the
physical structure and such disease or infection as
naturally results therefrom. These terms shall in no case
except as specifically provided in this chapter be construed
to include occupational disease in any form, nor shall they
be construed to include any contagious or infectious disease
contracted during the course of the employment, nor shall

SB 1385 4
they include death due to natural causes occurring while the
worker is at work.
4. "Death" when mentioned as a basis for the right to
compensation means only death resulting from such violence
and its resultant effects occurring within three hundred
weeks after the accident; except that in cases of
occupational disease, the limitation of three hundred weeks
shall not be applicable.
5. Injuries sustained in company-owned or subsidized
automobiles in accidents that occur while traveling from the
employee's home to the [employer's] employee's principal
place of business or from the [employer's] employee's
principal place of business to the employee's home are not
compensable. The extension of premises doctrine is
abrogated to the extent it extends liability for accidents
that occur on property not owned [or controlled] by the
employer even if the accident occurs on customary, approved,
permitted, usual or accepted routes used by the employee to
get to and from their place of employment.
6. The term "total disability" as used in this chapter
shall mean inability to return to any employment and not
merely mean inability to return to the employment in which
the employee was engaged at the time of the accident.
7. As used in this chapter and all acts amendatory
thereof, the term "commission" shall hereafter be construed
as meaning and referring exclusively to the labor and
100 industrial relations commission of Missouri, and the term
101 "director" shall hereafter be construed as meaning the
102 director of the department of commerce and insurance of the
103 state of Missouri or such agency of government as shall
104 exercise the powers and duties now conferred and imposed

SB 1385 5
105 upon the department of commerce and insurance of the state
106 of Missouri.
107 8. The term "division" as used in this chapter means
108 the division of workers' compensation of the department of
109 labor and industrial relations of the state of Missouri.
110 9. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "minor"
111 means a person who has not attained the age of eighteen
112 years; except that, for the purpose of computing the
113 compensation provided for in this chapter, the provisions of
114 section 287.250 shall control.
115 10. In applying the provisions of this chapter, it is
116 the intent of the legislature to reject and abrogate earlier
117 case law interpretations on the meaning of or definition of
118 "accident", "occupational disease", "arising out of", and
119 "in the course of the employment" to include, but not be
120 limited to, holdings in: Bennett v. Columbia Health Care
121 and Rehabilitation, 80 S.W.3d 524 (Mo.App. W.D. 2002); Kasl
122 v. Bristol Care, Inc., 984 S.W.2d 852 (Mo.banc 1999); and
123 Drewes v. TWA, 984 S.W.2d 512 (Mo.banc 1999) and all cases
124 citing, interpreting, applying, or following those cases.
125 11. For the purposes of this chapter, "occupational
126 diseases due to toxic exposure" shall only include the
127 following: mesothelioma, asbestosis, berylliosis, coal
128 worker's pneumoconiosis, brochiolitis obliterans, silicosis,
129 silicotuberculosis, manganism, acute myelogenous leukemia,
130 and myelodysplastic syndrome.
131 12. For the purposes of this chapter, "maximum medical
132 improvement" shall mean the point at which the injured
133 employee's medical condition has stabilized and can no
134 longer reasonably improve with additional medical care, as
135 determined within a reasonable degree of medical certainty.

SB 1385 6
287.021. 1. As used in this chapter, the term
"employee" includes a sheriff or deputy sheriff and the term
"employer" includes a county in regard to a sheriff or
deputy sheriff.
2. Each county shall provide workers' compensation
insurance in an insurance group licensed to write workers'
compensation insurance in this state, or a city also
recognized as a county may have at all times sufficient self-
insurance coverage, so that all sheriffs and deputy sheriffs
in the county or self-insured city recognized as a county
will be covered.
3. The "average [earnings] weekly wage" of a sheriff
or deputy sheriff is his annual salary, or fourteen dollars
per day, whichever is greater.
4. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to create any tort liability upon a county or to
impose any duty upon a county other than complying with this
chapter in relation to sheriffs and deputy sheriffs.
287.063. 1. An employee shall be conclusively deemed
to have been exposed to the hazards of an occupational
disease when for any length of time, however short, he is
employed in an occupation or process in which the hazard of
the disease exists, subject to the provisions relating to
occupational disease due to repetitive motion, as is set
forth in subsection 8 of section 287.067.
2. The employer liable for the compensation in this
section provided shall be the employer in whose employment
the employee was last exposed to the hazard of the
occupational disease prior to evidence of disability,
regardless of the length of time of such last exposure,
subject to the notice provision of section 287.420.

SB 1385 7
3. The statute of limitation referred to in section
287.430 shall not begin to run in cases of occupational
disease until it becomes reasonably discoverable and
apparent that an injury has been sustained related to such
exposure, except that in cases of loss of hearing due to
industrial noise said limitation shall not begin to run
until the employee is eligible to file a claim as
hereinafter provided in section 287.197. An injury becomes
"reasonably discoverable and apparent" when the injured
employee knew or should have known his or her injury was
related to his or her employment.
287.067. 1. In this chapter the term "occupational
disease" is hereby defined to mean, unless a different
meaning is clearly indicated by the context, an identifiable
disease or repetitive trauma injury arising with or without
human fault out of and in the course of the employment as
defined under subsection 3 of section 287.020. Ordinary
diseases of life to which the general public is exposed
outside of the employment shall not be compensable, except
where the diseases follow as an incident of an occupational
disease as defined in this section. The disease need not to
have been foreseen or expected but after its contraction it
must appear to have had its origin in a risk connected with
the employment and to have flowed from that source as a
rational consequence.
2. An injury or death by occupational disease is
compensable only if the occupational exposure was the
prevailing factor in causing both the resulting medical
condition and disability. The "prevailing factor" is
defined to be the primary factor, in relation to any other
factor, causing both the resulting medical condition and
disability. Ordinary, gradual deterioration, or progressive

SB 1385 8
degeneration of the body caused by aging or by the normal
activities of day-to-day living shall not be compensable.
3. An injury due to repetitive motion is recognized as
an occupational disease for purposes of this chapter. An
occupational disease due to repetitive motion is compensable
only if the occupational exposure was the prevailing factor
in causing both the resulting medical condition and
disability. The "prevailing factor" is defined to be the
primary factor, in relation to any other factor, causing
both the resulting medical condition and disability.
Ordinary, gradual deterioration, or progressive degeneration
of the body caused by aging or by the normal activities of
day-to-day living shall not be compensable. The exposure to
injury must arise out of and in the course of the employment
as defined under subsection 3 of section 287.020.
4. "Loss of hearing due to industrial noise" is
recognized as an occupational disease for purposes of this
chapter and is hereby defined to be a loss of hearing in one
or both ears due to prolonged exposure to harmful noise in
employment. "Harmful noise" means sound capable of
producing occupational deafness.
5. "Radiation disability" is recognized as an
occupational disease for purposes of this chapter and is
hereby defined to be that disability due to radioactive
properties or substances or to Roentgen rays (X-rays) or
exposure to ionizing radiation caused by any process
involving the use of or direct contact with radium or
radioactive properties or substances or the use of or direct
exposure to Roentgen rays (X-rays) or ionizing radiation.
6. Disease of the lungs or respiratory tract,
hypotension, hypertension, or disease of the heart or
cardiovascular system, including carcinoma, may be

SB 1385 9
recognized as occupational diseases for the purposes of this
chapter and are defined to be disability due to exposure to
smoke, gases, carcinogens, inadequate oxygen, of paid
firefighters of a paid fire department or paid police
officers of a paid police department certified under chapter
590 if a direct causal relationship is established, or
psychological stress of firefighters of a paid fire
department or paid peace officers of a police department who
are certified under chapter 590 if a direct causal
relationship is established.
7. Any employee who is exposed to and contracts any
contagious or communicable disease arising out of and in the
course of his or her employment shall be eligible for
benefits under this chapter as an occupational disease.
8. With regard to occupational disease due to
repetitive motion, if the exposure to the repetitive motion
which is found to be the cause of the injury is for a period
of less than three months and the evidence demonstrates that
the exposure to the repetitive motion with the immediate
prior employer was the prevailing factor in causing the
injury, the prior employer shall be liable for such
occupational disease.
9. (1) (a) Posttraumatic stress disorder (PTSD), as
described in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Health Disorders, Fifth Edition, published by the American
Psychiatric Association, (DSM-5) is recognized as a
compensable occupational disease for purposes of this
chapter when diagnosed in a first responder, as that term is
defined under section 67.145.
(b) Benefits payable to a first responder under this
section shall not require a physical injury to the first
responder, and are not subject to any preexisting PTSD.

SB 1385 10
(c) Benefits payable to a first responder under this
section are compensable only if demonstrated by clear and
convincing evidence that PTSD has resulted from the course
and scope of employment, and the first responder is examined
and diagnosed with PTSD by an authorized treating physician,
due to the first responder experiencing one of the following
qualifying events:
a. Seeing for oneself a deceased minor;
b. Witnessing directly the death of a minor;
c. Witnessing directly the injury to a minor who
subsequently died prior to or upon arrival at a hospital
emergency department, participating in the physical
treatment of, or manually transporting, an injured minor who
subsequently died prior to or upon arrival at a hospital
100 emergency department;
101 d. Seeing for oneself a person who has suffered
102 serious physical injury of a nature that shocks the
103 conscience;
104 e. Witnessing directly a death, including suicide, due
105 to serious physical injury; or homicide, including murder,
106 mass killings, manslaughter, self-defense, misadventure, and
107 negligence;
108 f. Witnessing directly an injury that results in
109 death, if the person suffered serious physical injury that
110 shocks the conscience;
111 g. Participating in the physical treatment of an
112 injury, including attempted suicide, or manually
113 transporting an injured person who suffered serious physical
114 injury, if the injured person subsequently died prior to or
115 upon arrival at a hospital emergency department; or
116 h. Involvement in an event that caused or may have
117 caused serious injury or harm to the first responder or had

SB 1385 11
118 the potential to cause the death of the first responder,
119 whether accidental or by an intentional act of another
120 individual.
121 (2) The time for notice of injury or death in cases of
122 compensable PTSD under this section is measured from
123 exposure to one of the qualifying stressors listed in the
124 DSM-5 criteria, or the diagnosis of the disorder, whichever
125 is later. Any claim for compensation for such injury shall
126 be properly noticed within fifty-two weeks after the
127 qualifying exposure, or the diagnosis of the disorder,
128 whichever is later.
287.120. 1. Every employer subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall be liable, irrespective of negligence,
to furnish compensation under the provisions of this chapter
for personal injury or death of the employee by accident or
occupational disease arising out of and in the course of the
employee's employment. Any employee of such employer shall
not be liable for any injury or death for which compensation
is recoverable under this chapter and every employer and
employees of such employer shall be released from all other
liability whatsoever, whether to the employee or any other
person, except that an employee shall not be released from
liability for injury or death if the employee engaged in an
affirmative negligent act that purposefully and dangerously
caused or increased the risk of injury. The term "accident"
as used in this section shall include, but not be limited
to, injury or death of the employee caused by the unprovoked
violence or assault against the employee by any person.
2. The rights and remedies herein granted to an
employee shall exclude all other rights and remedies of the
employee, the employee's spouse, parents, personal
representatives, dependents, heirs or next kin, at common

SB 1385 12
law or otherwise, on account of such injury or death by
accident or occupational disease, except such rights and
remedies as are not provided for by this chapter.
3. No compensation shall be allowed under this chapter
for the injury or death due to the employee's intentional
self-inflicted injury, but the burden of proof of
intentional self-inflicted injury shall be on the employer
or the person contesting the claim for allowance.
4. Where the injury is caused by the failure of the
employer to comply with any statute in this state or any
lawful order of the division or the commission, the
compensation and death benefit provided for under this
chapter shall be increased fifteen percent.
5. Where the injury is caused by the failure of the
employee to use safety devices where provided by the
employer, or from the employee's failure to obey any
reasonable rule adopted by the employer for the safety of
employees, the [compensation and death] indemnity benefit
provided for herein shall be reduced at least twenty-five
but not more than fifty percent; provided, that it is shown
that the employee had actual knowledge of the rule so
adopted by the employer; and provided, further, that the
employer had, prior to the injury, made a reasonable effort
to cause his or her employees to use the safety device or
devices and to obey or follow the rule so adopted for the
safety of the employees.
6. (1) Where the employee fails to obey any rule or
policy adopted by the employer relating to a drug-free
workplace or the use of alcohol or nonprescribed controlled
drugs in the workplace, the [compensation and death]
indemnity benefit provided for herein shall be reduced fifty

SB 1385 13
percent if the injury was sustained in conjunction with the
use of alcohol or nonprescribed controlled drugs.
(2) If, however, the use of alcohol or nonprescribed
controlled drugs in violation of the employer's rule or
policy is the proximate cause of the injury, then the
benefits or compensation otherwise payable under this
chapter for death or disability shall be forfeited.
(3) The voluntary use of alcohol to the percentage of
blood alcohol sufficient under Missouri law to constitute
legal intoxication shall give rise to a rebuttable
presumption that the voluntary use of alcohol under such
circumstances was the proximate cause of the injury. A
preponderance of the evidence standard shall apply to rebut
such presumption. An employee's refusal to take a test for
alcohol or a nonprescribed controlled substance, as defined
by section 195.010, at the request of the employer shall
result in the forfeiture of benefits under this chapter if
the employer had sufficient cause to suspect use of alcohol
or a nonprescribed controlled substance by the claimant or
if the employer's policy clearly authorizes post-injury
testing.
(4) Any positive test result for a nonprescribed
controlled drug or the metabolites of such drug from an
employee shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption, which
may be rebutted by a preponderance of evidence, that the
tested nonprescribed controlled drug was in the employee's
system at the time of the accident or injury and that the
injury was sustained in conjunction with the use of the
tested nonprescribed controlled drug if:
(a) The initial testing was administered within twenty-
four hours of the accident or injury;

SB 1385 14
(b) Notice was given to the employee of the test
results within fourteen calendar days of the insurer or
group self-insurer receiving actual notice of the
confirmatory test results;
(c) The employee was given an opportunity to perform a
second test upon the original sample; and
(d) The initial or any subsequent testing that forms
the basis of the presumption was confirmed by mass
spectrometry using generally accepted medical or forensic
testing procedures.
7. Where the employee's participation in a
recreational activity or program is the prevailing cause of
the injury, benefits or compensation otherwise payable under
this chapter for death or disability shall be forfeited
regardless that the employer may have promoted, sponsored or
supported the recreational activity or program, expressly or
100 impliedly, in whole or in part. The forfeiture of benefits
101 or compensation shall not apply when:
102 (1) The employee was directly ordered by the employer
103 to participate in such recreational activity or program; or
104 (2) [The employee was paid wages or travel expenses
105 while participating in such recreational activity or
106 program; or
107 (3)] The injury from such recreational activity or
108 program occurs on the employer's premises due to an unsafe
109 condition and the employer had actual knowledge of the
110 employee's participation in the recreational activity or
111 program and of the unsafe condition of the premises and
112 failed to either curtail the recreational activity or
113 program or cure the unsafe condition.
114 8. Mental injury resulting from work-related stress
115 does not arise out of and in the course of the employment,

SB 1385 15
116 unless it is demonstrated that the stress is work related
117 and was extraordinary and unusual, by comparison with
118 employees working in the same position. The amount of work
119 stress shall be measured by objective standards and actual
120 events.
121 9. A mental injury is not considered to arise out of
122 and in the course of the employment if it resulted from any
123 disciplinary action, work evaluation, job transfer, layoff,
124 demotion, termination or any similar action taken in good
125 faith by the employer.
126 10. The ability of a firefighter to receive benefits
127 for psychological stress under section 287.067 shall not be
128 diminished by the provisions of subsections 8 and 9 of this
129 section.
287.127. 1. Beginning January 1, 1993, all employers
shall post a notice at their place of employment, in a
sufficient number of places on the premises to assure that
such notice will reasonably be seen by all employees. An
employer for whom services are performed by individuals who
may not reasonably be expected to see a posted notice shall
notify each such employee in writing of the contents of such
notice. The notice shall include:
(1) That the employer is operating under and subject
to the provisions of the Missouri workers' compensation law;
(2) That employees must report all injuries
immediately to the employer by advising the employer
personally, the employer's designated individual or the
employee's immediate boss, supervisor or foreman and that
the employee may lose the right to receive compensation if
the injury or illness is not reported within thirty days or
in the case of occupational illness or disease, within
thirty days of [the time he or she is reasonably aware of

SB 1385 16
work relatedness of the injury or illness] when medically
advised of the contracture of an occupational disease;
employees who fail to notify their employer within thirty
days may jeopardize their ability to receive compensation,
and any other benefits under this chapter;
(3) The name, address and telephone number of the
insurer, if insured. If self-insured, the name, address and
telephone number of the employer's designated individual
responsible for reporting injuries or the name, address and
telephone number of the adjusting company or service company
designated by the employer to handle workers' compensation
matters;
(4) The name, address and the toll-free telephone
number of the division of workers' compensation;
(5) That the employer will supply, upon request,
additional information provided by the division of workers'
compensation;
(6) That a fraudulent action by the employer, employee
or any other person is unlawful.
2. The division of workers' compensation shall develop
the notice to be posted, distribute such notice free of
charge to employers and insurers upon request, and publish
the notice on the website of the department of labor and
industrial relations. Failure to request such notice does
not relieve the employer of its obligation to post the
notice. If the employer carries workers' compensation
insurance, the carrier shall provide the notice, in paper or
electronic format, to the insured within thirty days of the
insurance policy's inception date. A carrier who elects to
provide the notice in electronic format shall direct the
insured to the notice available on the website of the
department of labor and industrial relations.

SB 1385 17
3. Any employer who willfully violates the provisions
of this section shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor and
shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars
nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in
the county jail for not more than six months or by both such
fine and imprisonment, and each such violation or each day
such violation continues shall be deemed a separate offense.
287.140. 1. In addition to all other compensation
paid to the employee under this section, the employee shall
receive and the employer shall provide such medical,
surgical, chiropractic, and hospital treatment, including
nursing, custodial, ambulance and medicines, as may
reasonably be required after the injury or disability, to
cure and relieve from the effects of the injury. If the
employee desires, he shall have the right to select his own
physician, surgeon, or other such requirement at his own
expense. Where the requirements are furnished by a public
hospital or other institution, payment therefor shall be
made to the proper authorities. Regardless of whether the
health care provider is selected by the employer or is
selected by the employee at the employee's expense, the
health care provider shall have the affirmative duty to
communicate fully with the employee regarding the nature of
the employee's injury and recommended treatment exclusive of
any evaluation for a permanent disability rating. Failure
to perform such duty to communicate shall constitute a
disciplinary violation by the provider subject to the
provisions of chapter 620. When an employee is required to
submit to medical examinations or necessary medical
treatment at a place outside of the local or metropolitan
area from the employee's principal place of employment, the
employer or its insurer shall advance or reimburse the

SB 1385 18
employee for all necessary and reasonable expenses; except
that an injured employee who resides outside the state of
Missouri and who is employed by an employer located in
Missouri shall have the option of selecting the location of
services provided in this section either at a location
within one hundred miles of the injured employee's
residence, place of injury or place of hire by the
employer. The choice of provider within the location
selected shall continue to be made by the employer. In case
of a medical examination if a dispute arises as to what
expenses shall be paid by the employer, the matter shall be
presented to the legal advisor, the administrative law judge
or the commission, who shall set the sum to be paid and same
shall be paid by the employer prior to the medical
examination. In no event, however, shall the employer or
its insurer be required to pay transportation costs for a
greater distance than two hundred fifty miles each way from
place of treatment.
2. If it be shown to the division or the commission
that the requirements are being furnished in such manner
that there is reasonable ground for believing that the life,
health, or recovery of the employee is endangered thereby,
the division or the commission may order a change in the
physician, surgeon, hospital or other requirement.
3. The division shall establish by rule a schedule of
fees for any service provided pursuant to this chapter. All
fees and charges under this chapter shall be [fair and
reasonable, shall be] in accordance with the fee schedule
promulgated by the division and subject to regulation by the
division or the commission, or the board of rehabilitation
in rehabilitation cases. A health care provider shall not
charge a fee for treatment and care which is governed by the

SB 1385 19
provisions of this chapter greater than [the usual and
customary fee the provider receives for the same treatment
or service when the payor for such treatment or service is a
private individual or a private health insurance carrier]
that allowed pursuant to the fee schedule promulgated by the
division. The division or the commission, or the board of
rehabilitation in rehabilitation cases, shall also have
jurisdiction to hear and determine all disputes as to such
charges. A health care provider is bound by the
determination upon the reasonableness of health care bills.
4. The division shall, by regulation, establish
methods to resolve disputes concerning the reasonableness of
medical charges, services, or aids. This regulation shall
govern resolution of disputes between employers and medical
providers over fees charged, whether or not paid, and shall
be in lieu of any other administrative procedure under this
chapter. The employee shall not be a party to a dispute
over medical charges, nor shall the employee's recovery in
any way be jeopardized because of such dispute. Any
[application for payment of additional reimbursement, as
such term is used in 8 CSR 50- 2.030, as amended,] medical
fee dispute shall be filed not later than:
(1) Two years from the date the first notice of
dispute of the medical charge was received by the health
care provider if such services were rendered before July 1,
2013; [and]
(2) One year from the date the first notice of dispute
of the medical charge was received by the health care
provider if such services were rendered after July 1, 2013;
and
(3) Two years from the date of service, when no
payment has been made.

SB 1385 20
Notice shall be presumed to occur no later than five
business days after transmission by certified United States
mail.
5. No compensation shall be payable for the death or
disability of an employee, if and insofar as the death or
disability may be caused, continued or aggravated by any
unreasonable refusal to submit to any medical or surgical
treatment or operation, the risk of which is, in the opinion
of the division or the commission, inconsiderable in view of
the seriousness of the injury. If the employee dies as a
100 result of an operation made necessary by the injury, the
101 death shall be deemed to be caused by the injury.
102 6. The testimony of any physician or chiropractic
103 physician who treated the employee shall be admissible in
104 evidence in any proceedings for compensation under this
105 chapter, subject to all of the provisions of section 287.210.
106 7. Every hospital or other person furnishing the
107 employee with medical aid shall permit its record to be
108 copied by and shall furnish full information to the division
109 or the commission, the employer, the employee or his
110 dependents and any other party to any proceedings for
111 compensation under this chapter, and certified copies of the
112 records shall be admissible in evidence in any such
113 proceedings.
114 8. The employer may be required by the division or the
115 commission to furnish an injured employee with artificial
116 legs, arms, hands, surgical orthopedic joints, or eyes, or
117 braces, as needed, for life whenever the division or the
118 commission shall find that the injured employee may be
119 partially or wholly relieved of the effects of a permanent
120 injury by the use thereof. [The director of the division
121 shall establish a procedure whereby a claim for compensation

SB 1385 21
122 may be reactivated after settlement of such claim is
123 completed. The claim shall be reactivated only after the
124 claimant can show good cause for the reactivation of this
125 claim and the claim shall be made only for the payment of
126 medical procedures involving life-threatening surgical
127 procedures or if the claimant requires the use of a new, or
128 the modification, alteration or exchange of an existing,
129 prosthetic device. For the purpose of this subsection,
130 "life threatening" shall mean a situation or condition
131 which, if not treated immediately, will likely result in the
132 death of the injured worker.]
133 9. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent an employee
134 being provided treatment for his injuries by prayer or
135 spiritual means if the employer does not object to the
136 treatment.
137 10. The employer shall have the right to select the
138 licensed treating physician, surgeon, chiropractic
139 physician, or other health care provider; provided, however,
140 that such physicians, surgeons or other health care
141 providers shall offer only those services authorized within
142 the scope of their licenses. For the purpose of this
143 subsection, subsection 2 of section 287.030 shall not apply.
144 11. Any physician or other health care provider who
145 orders, directs or refers a patient for treatment, testing,
146 therapy or rehabilitation at any institution or facility
147 shall, at or prior to the time of the referral, disclose in
148 writing if such health care provider, any of his partners or
149 his employer has a financial interest in the institution or
150 facility to which the patient is being referred, to the
151 following:
152 (1) The patient;

SB 1385 22
153 (2) The employer of the patient with workers'
154 compensation liability for the injury or disease being
155 treated;
156 (3) The workers' compensation insurer of such
157 employer; and
158 (4) The workers' compensation adjusting company for
159 such insurer.
160 12. Violation of subsection 11 of this section is a
161 class A misdemeanor.
162 13. (1) No hospital, physician or other health care
163 provider, other than a hospital, physician or health care
164 provider selected by the employee at his own expense
165 pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, shall bill or
166 attempt to collect any fee or any portion of a fee for
167 services rendered to an employee due to a work-related
168 injury or report to any credit reporting agency any failure
169 of the employee to make such payment, when an injury covered
170 by this chapter has occurred and such hospital, physician or
171 health care provider has received actual notice given in
172 writing by the employee, the employer or the employer's
173 insurer. Actual notice shall be deemed received by the
174 hospital, physician or health care provider five days after
175 mailing by certified mail by the employer or insurer to the
176 hospital, physician or health care provider.
177 (2) The notice shall include:
178 (a) The name of the employer;
179 (b) The name of the insurer, if known;
180 (c) The name of the employee receiving the services;
181 (d) The general nature of the injury, if known; and
182 (e) Where a claim has been filed, the claim number, if
183 known.

SB 1385 23
184 (3) When an injury is found to be noncompensable under
185 this chapter, the hospital, physician or other health care
186 provider shall be entitled to pursue the employee for any
187 unpaid portion of the fee or other charges for authorized
188 services provided to the employee. Any applicable statute
189 of limitations for an action for such fees or other charges
190 shall be tolled from the time notice is given to the
191 division by a hospital, physician or other health care
192 provider pursuant to subdivision (6) of this subsection,
193 until a determination of noncompensability in regard to the
194 injury which is the basis of such services is made, or in
195 the event there is an appeal to the labor and industrial
196 relations commission, until a decision is rendered by that
197 commission.
198 (4) If a hospital, physician or other health care
199 provider or a debt collector on behalf of such hospital,
200 physician or other health care provider pursues any action
201 to collect from an employee after such notice is properly
202 given, the employee shall have a cause of action against the
203 hospital, physician or other health care provider for actual
204 damages sustained plus up to one thousand dollars in
205 additional damages, costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
206 (5) If an employer or insurer fails to make payment
207 for authorized services provided to the employee by a
208 hospital, physician or other health care provider pursuant
209 to this chapter, the hospital, physician or other health
210 care provider may proceed pursuant to subsection 4 of this
211 section with a dispute against the employer or insurer for
212 any fees or other charges for services provided.
213 (6) A hospital, physician or other health care
214 provider whose services have been authorized in advance by
215 the employer or insurer may give notice to the division of

SB 1385 24
216 any claim for fees or other charges for services provided
217 for a work-related injury that is covered by this chapter,
218 with copies of the notice to the employee, employer and the
219 employer's insurer. Where such notice has been filed, the
220 administrative law judge may order direct payment from the
221 proceeds of any settlement or award to the hospital,
222 physician or other health care provider for such fees as are
223 determined by the division. The notice shall be on a form
224 prescribed by the division.
225 14. The employer may allow or require an employee to
226 use any of the employee's accumulated paid leave, personal
227 leave, or medical or sick leave to attend to medical
228 treatment, physical rehabilitation, or medical evaluations
229 during work time. The intent of this subsection is to
230 specifically supercede and abrogate any case law that
231 contradicts the express language of this section.
287.150. 1. Where a third person is liable to the
employee or to the dependents, for the injury or death, the
employer shall [be subrogated to the right of the employee
or to the dependents] have a subrogation lien against such
third person, and the recovery by such employer shall not be
limited to the amount payable as compensation to such
employee or dependents, but such employer may recover any
amount which such employee or his dependents would have been
entitled to recover. Any recovery by the employer against
such third person shall be apportioned between the employer
and employee or his dependents using the provisions of
subsections 2 and 3 of this section.
2. When a third person is liable for the death of an
employee and compensation is paid or payable under this
chapter, and recovery is had by a dependent under this
chapter either by judgment or settlement for the wrongful

SB 1385 25
death of the employee, the employer shall have a subrogation
lien on any recovery and shall receive or have credit for
sums paid or payable under this chapter to any of the
dependents of the deceased employee to the extent of the
settlement or recovery by such dependents for the wrongful
death. Recovery by the employer and credit for future
installments shall be computed using the provisions of
subsection 3 of this section relating to comparative fault
of the employee.
3. Whenever recovery against the third person is
effected by the employee or his dependents, the employer
shall pay from his share of the recovery a proportionate
share of the expenses of the recovery, including a
reasonable attorney fee. After the expenses and attorney
fee have been paid, the balance of the recovery shall be
apportioned between the employer and the employee or his
dependents in the same ratio that the amount due the
employer bears to the total amount recovered if there is no
finding of comparative fault on the part of the employee, or
the total damages determined by the trier of fact if there
is a finding of comparative fault on the part of the
employee. Notwithstanding the foregoing provision, the
balance of the recovery may be divided between the employer
and the employee or his dependents as they may otherwise
agree. Any part of the recovery found to be due to the
employer, the employee or his dependents shall be paid
forthwith and any part of the recovery paid to the employee
or his dependents under this section shall be treated by
them as an advance payment by the employer on account of any
future installments of compensation in the following manner:
(1) The total amount paid to the employee or his
dependents shall be treated as an advance payment if there

SB 1385 26
is no finding of comparative fault on the part of the
employee; or
(2) A percentage of the amount paid to the employee or
his dependents equal to the percentage of fault assessed to
the third person from whom recovery is made shall be treated
as an advance payment if there is a finding of comparative
fault on the part of the employee.
4. In any case in which an injured employee has been
paid benefits from the second injury fund as provided in
subsection 3 of section 287.141, and recovery is had against
the third party liable to the employee for the injury, the
second injury fund shall be subrogated to the rights of the
employee against said third party to the extent of the
payments made to him from such fund, subject to provisions
of subsections 2 and 3 of this section.
5. No construction design professional who is retained
to perform professional services on a construction project
or any employee of a construction design professional who is
assisting or representing the construction design
professional in the performance of professional services on
the site of the construction project shall be liable for any
injury resulting from the employer's failure to comply with
safety standards on a construction project for which
compensation is recoverable under the workers' compensation
law, unless responsibility for safety practices is
specifically assumed by contract. The immunity provided by
this subsection to any construction design professional
shall not apply to the negligent preparation of design plans
or specifications.
6. Any provision in any contract or subcontract, where
one party is an employer in the construction group of code
classifications, which purports to waive subrogation rights

SB 1385 27
provided under this section in anticipation of a future
injury or death is hereby declared against public policy and
void. Each contract of insurance for workers' compensation
shall require the insurer to diligently pursue all
subrogation rights of the employer and shall require the
employer to fully cooperate with the insurer in pursuing
such recoveries, except that the employer may enter into
compromise agreements with an insurer in lieu of the insurer
pursuing subrogation against another party. The amount of
any subrogation recovery by an insurer shall be credited
against the amount of the actual paid losses in the
determination of such employer's experience modification
factor within forty-five days of the collection of such
amount.
[7. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section, when a third person or party is liable to the
employee, to the dependents of an employee, or to any person
eligible to sue for the employee's wrongful death as
provided is section 537.080 in a case where the employee
100 suffers or suffered from an occupational disease due to
101 toxic exposure and the employee, dependents, or persons
102 eligible to sue for wrongful death are compensated under
103 this chapter, in no case shall the employer then be
104 subrogated to the rights of an employee, dependents, or
105 persons eligible to sue for wrongful death against such
106 third person or party when the occupational disease due to
107 toxic exposure arose from the employee's work for employer.]
287.210. 1. After an employee has received an injury
he shall from time to time thereafter during disability
submit to reasonable medical examination at the request of
the employer, the employer's insurer, the commission, the
division, an administrative law judge, or the attorney

SB 1385 28
general on behalf of the second injury fund if the employer
has not obtained a medical examination report, the time and
place of which shall be fixed with due regard to the
convenience of the employee and his physical condition and
ability to attend. The employee may have his own physician
present, and if the employee refuses to submit to the
examination, or in any way obstructs it, his right to
compensation shall be forfeited during such period unless in
the opinion of the commission the circumstances justify the
refusal or obstruction.
2. The commission, the division or administrative law
judge shall, when deemed necessary, appoint a duly qualified
impartial physician to examine the injured employee, and any
physician so chosen, if he accepts the appointment, shall
promptly make the examination requested and make a complete
medical report to the commission or the division in such
duplication as to provide all parties with copies thereof.
The physician's fee shall be [fair and reasonable, as
provided in] subject to subsection 3 of section 287.140, and
the fee and other reasonable costs of the impartial
examination may be paid as other costs under this chapter.
If all the parties shall have had reasonable access thereto,
the report of the physician shall be admissible in evidence.
3. The testimony of any physician who treated or
examined the injured employee shall be admissible in
evidence in any proceedings for compensation under this
chapter, but only if the medical report of the physician has
been made available to all parties as in this section
provided. Immediately upon receipt of notice from the
division or the commission setting a date for hearing of a
case in which the nature and extent of an employee's
disability is to be determined, the parties or their

SB 1385 29
attorneys shall arrange, without charge or costs, each to
the other, for an exchange of all medical reports, including
those made both by treating and examining physician or
physicians, to the end that the parties may be commonly
informed of all medical findings and opinions. The exchange
of medical reports shall be made at least seven days before
the date set for the hearing and failure of any party to
comply may be grounds for asking for and receiving a
continuance, upon proper showing by the party to whom the
medical reports were not furnished. If any party fails or
refuses to furnish the opposing party with the medical
report of the treating or examining physician at least seven
days before such physician's deposition or personal
testimony at the hearing, as in this section provided, upon
the objection of the party who was not provided with the
medical report, the physician shall not be permitted to
testify at that hearing or by medical deposition.
4. Upon request, an administrative law judge, the
division, or the commission shall be provided with a copy of
any medical report.
5. As used in this chapter the terms "physician's
report" and "medical report" mean the report of any
physician made on any printed form authorized by the
division or the commission or any complete medical report.
As used in this chapter the term "complete medical report"
means the report of a physician giving the physician's
qualifications and the patient's history, complaints,
details of the findings of any and all laboratory, X-ray and
all other technical examinations, diagnosis, prognosis,
nature of disability, if any, and an estimate of the
percentage of permanent partial disability, if any. An

SB 1385 30
element or elements of a complete medical report may be met
by the physician's records.
6. Upon the request of a party, the physician or
physicians who treated or are treating the injured employee
shall be required to furnish to the parties a rating and
complete medical report on the injured employee, at the
expense of the party selecting the physician, along with a
complete copy of the physician's clinical record including
copies of any records and reports received from other health
care providers.
7. The testimony of a treating or examining physician
may be submitted in evidence on the issues in controversy by
a complete medical report and shall be admissible without
other foundational evidence subject to compliance with the
following procedures. The party intending to submit a
complete medical report in evidence shall give notice at
least sixty days prior to the hearing to all parties and
shall provide reasonable opportunity to all parties to
obtain cross-examination testimony of the physician by
deposition. The notice shall include a copy of the report
and all the clinical and treatment records of the physician
including copies of all records and reports received by the
physician from other health care providers. The party
offering the report must make the physician available for
cross-examination testimony by deposition not later than
seven days before the matter is set for hearing, and each
cross-examiner shall compensate the physician for the
portion of testimony obtained in an amount not to exceed a
rate of reasonable compensation taking into consideration
the specialty practiced by the physician. Cross-examination
testimony shall not bind the cross-examining party. Any
100 testimony obtained by the offering party shall be at that

SB 1385 31
101 party's expense on a proportional basis, including the
102 deposition fee of the physician. Upon request of any party,
103 the party offering a complete medical report in evidence
104 must also make available copies of X rays or other
105 diagnostic studies obtained by or relied upon by the
106 physician. Within ten days after receipt of such notice a
107 party shall dispute whether a report meets the requirements
108 of a complete medical report by providing written objections
109 to the offering party stating the grounds for the dispute,
110 and at the request of any party, the administrative law
111 judge shall rule upon such objections upon pretrial hearing
112 whether the report meets the requirements of a complete
113 medical report and upon the admissibility of the report or
114 portions thereof. If no objections are filed the report is
115 admissible, and any objections thereto are deemed waived.
116 Nothing herein shall prevent the parties from agreeing to
117 admit medical reports or records by consent.
118 8. Certified copies of the proceedings before any
119 coroner holding an inquest over the body of any employee
120 receiving an injury in the course of his employment
121 resulting in death shall be admissible in evidence in any
122 proceedings for compensation under this chapter, and it
123 shall be the duty of the coroner to give notice of the
124 inquest to the employer and the dependents of the deceased
125 employee, who shall have the right to cross-examine the
126 witness.
127 9. The division or the commission may in its
128 discretion in extraordinary cases order a postmortem
129 examination and for that purpose may also order a body
130 exhumed.
287.220. 1. There is hereby created in the state
treasury a special fund to be known as the "Second Injury

SB 1385 32
Fund" created exclusively for the purposes as in this
section provided and for special weekly benefits in
rehabilitation cases as provided in section 287.141.
Maintenance of the second injury fund shall be as provided
by section 287.710. The state treasurer shall be the
custodian of the second injury fund which shall be deposited
the same as are state funds and any interest accruing
thereon shall be added thereto. The fund shall be subject
to audit the same as state funds and accounts and shall be
protected by the general bond given by the state treasurer.
Upon the requisition of the director of the division of
workers' compensation, warrants on the state treasurer for
the payment of all amounts payable for compensation and
benefits out of the second injury fund shall be issued.
2. All cases of permanent disability where there has
been previous disability due to injuries occurring prior to
January 1, 2014, shall be compensated as provided in this
subsection. Compensation shall be computed on the basis of
the average earnings at the time of the last injury. If any
employee who has a preexisting permanent partial disability
whether from compensable injury or otherwise, of such
seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or obstacle to
employment or to obtaining reemployment if the employee
becomes unemployed, and the preexisting permanent partial
disability, if a body as a whole injury, equals a minimum of
fifty weeks of compensation or, if a major extremity injury
only, equals a minimum of fifteen percent permanent partial
disability, according to the medical standards that are used
in determining such compensation, receives a subsequent
compensable injury resulting in additional permanent partial
disability so that the degree or percentage of disability,
in an amount equal to a minimum of fifty weeks compensation,

SB 1385 33
if a body as a whole injury or, if a major extremity injury
only, equals a minimum of fifteen percent permanent partial
disability, caused by the combined disabilities is
substantially greater than that which would have resulted
from the last injury, considered alone and of itself, and if
the employee is entitled to receive compensation on the
basis of the combined disabilities, the employer at the time
of the last injury shall be liable only for the degree or
percentage of disability which would have resulted from the
last injury had there been no preexisting disability. After
the compensation liability of the employer for the last
injury, considered alone, has been determined by an
administrative law judge or the commission, the degree or
percentage of employee's disability that is attributable to
all injuries or conditions existing at the time the last
injury was sustained shall then be determined by that
administrative law judge or by the commission and the degree
or percentage of disability which existed prior to the last
injury plus the disability resulting from the last injury,
if any, considered alone, shall be deducted from the
combined disability, and compensation for the balance, if
any, shall be paid out of a special fund known as the second
injury fund, hereinafter provided for. If the previous
disability or disabilities, whether from compensable injury
or otherwise, and the last injury together result in total
and permanent disability, the minimum standards under this
subsection for a body as a whole injury or a major extremity
injury shall not apply and the employer at the time of the
last injury shall be liable only for the disability
resulting from the last injury considered alone and of
itself; except that if the compensation for which the
employer at the time of the last injury is liable is less

SB 1385 34
than the compensation provided in this chapter for permanent
total disability, then in addition to the compensation for
which the employer is liable and after the completion of
payment of the compensation by the employer, the employee
shall be paid the remainder of the compensation that would
be due for permanent total disability under section 287.200
out of the second injury fund.
3. (1) All claims against the second injury fund for
injuries occurring after January 1, 2014, and all claims
against the second injury fund involving a subsequent
compensable injury which is an occupational disease filed
after January 1, 2014, shall be compensated as provided in
this subsection.
(2) No claims for permanent partial disability
occurring after January 1, 2014, shall be filed against the
second injury fund. Claims for permanent total disability
under section 287.200 against the second injury fund shall
be compensable only when the following conditions are met:
(a) a. An employee has a [medically documented]
preexisting disability equaling a minimum of fifty weeks of
permanent partial disability compensation according to the
medical standards that are used in determining such
compensation which is:
(i) A direct result of active military duty in any
branch of the United States Armed Forces; or
(ii) A direct result of a compensable injury as
defined in section 287.020 or 287.067; or
(iii) Not a compensable injury, but such preexisting
disability directly and significantly aggravates or
accelerates the subsequent work-related injury and shall not
include unrelated preexisting injuries or conditions that do

SB 1385 35
not aggravate or accelerate the subsequent work-related
injury; or
100 (iv) A preexisting permanent partial disability of an
101 extremity, loss of eyesight in one eye, or loss of hearing
102 in one ear, when there is a subsequent compensable work-
103 related injury as set forth in subparagraph b of the
104 opposite extremity, loss of eyesight in the other eye, or
105 loss of hearing in the other ear; and
106 b. Such employee thereafter sustains a subsequent
107 compensable work-related injury that, when combined with the
108 preexisting disability, as set forth in items (i), (ii),
109 (iii), or (iv) of subparagraph a. of this paragraph, results
110 in a permanent total disability as defined under this
111 chapter; or
112 (b) An employee is employed in a sheltered workshop as
113 established in sections 205.968 to 205.972 or sections
114 178.900 to 178.960 and such employee thereafter sustains a
115 compensable work-related injury that, when combined with the
116 preexisting disability, results in a permanent total
117 disability as defined under this chapter.
118 (3) When an employee is entitled to compensation as
119 provided in this subsection, the employer at the time of the
120 last work-related injury shall only be liable for the
121 disability resulting from the subsequent work-related injury
122 considered alone and of itself.
123 (4) If the employee is entitled to receive
124 compensation on the basis of the combined disabilities, the
125 employer at the time of the last injury shall be liable only
126 for the degree or percentage of disability which would have
127 resulted from the last injury had there been no preexisting
128 disability. After the compensation liability of the
129 employer for the last injury, considered alone, has been

SB 1385 36
130 determined by an administrative law judge or the commission,
131 the degree or percentage of employee's disability that is
132 attributable to all injuries or conditions existing at the
133 time the last injury was sustained shall then be determined
134 by that administrative law judge or by the commission and
135 the degree or percentage of disability which existed prior
136 to the last injury plus the disability resulting from the
137 last injury, if any, considered alone, shall be deducted
138 from the combined disability, and compensation for the
139 balance, if any, shall be paid out of a special fund known
140 as the second injury fund.
141 (5) Compensation for benefits payable under this
142 subsection shall be based on the employee's compensation
143 rate calculated under section 287.250.
144 4. (1) In all cases in which a recovery against the
145 second injury fund is sought for permanent partial
146 disability, permanent total disability, or death, the state
147 treasurer as custodian thereof shall be named as a party,
148 and shall be entitled to defend against the claim.
149 (2) The state treasurer, with the advice and consent
150 of the attorney general of Missouri, may enter into
151 compromise settlements as contemplated by section 287.390,
152 or agreed statements of fact that would affect the second
153 injury fund. All awards for permanent partial disability,
154 permanent total disability, or death affecting the second
155 injury fund shall be subject to the provisions of this
156 chapter governing review and appeal.
157 (3) For all claims filed against the second injury
158 fund on or after July 1, 1994, the attorney general shall
159 use assistant attorneys general except in circumstances
160 where an actual or potential conflict of interest exists, to
161 provide legal services as may be required in all claims made

SB 1385 37
162 for recovery against the fund. Any legal expenses incurred
163 by the attorney general's office in the handling of such
164 claims, including, but not limited to, medical examination
165 fees incurred under sections 287.210 and the expenses
166 provided for under section 287.140, expert witness fees,
167 court reporter expenses, travel costs, and related legal
168 expenses shall be paid by the fund. Effective July 1, 1993,
169 the payment of such legal expenses shall be contingent upon
170 annual appropriations made by the general assembly, from the
171 fund, to the attorney general's office for this specific
172 purpose.
173 5. If more than one injury in the same employment
174 causes concurrent temporary disabilities, compensation shall
175 be payable only for the longest and largest paying
176 disability.
177 6. If more than one injury in the same employment
178 causes concurrent and consecutive permanent partial
179 disability, compensation payments for each subsequent
180 disability shall not begin until the end of the compensation
181 period of the prior disability.
182 7. If an employer fails to insure or self-insure as
183 required in section 287.280, funds from the second injury
184 fund may be withdrawn to cover the fair, reasonable, and
185 necessary expenses incurred relating to claims for injuries
186 occurring prior to January 1, 2014, to cure and relieve the
187 effects of the injury or disability of an injured employee
188 in the employ of an uninsured employer consistent with
189 subsection 3 of section 287.140, or in the case of death of
190 an employee in the employ of an uninsured employer, funds
191 from the second injury fund may be withdrawn to cover fair,
192 reasonable, and necessary expenses incurred relating to a
193 death occurring prior to January 1, 2014, in the manner

SB 1385 38
194 required in sections 287.240 and 287.241. In defense of
195 claims arising under this subsection, the treasurer of the
196 state of Missouri, as custodian of the second injury fund,
197 shall have the same defenses to such claims as would the
198 uninsured employer. Any funds received by the employee or
199 the employee's dependents, through civil or other action,
200 must go towards reimbursement of the second injury fund, for
201 all payments made to the employee, the employee's
202 dependents, or paid on the employee's behalf, from the
203 second injury fund pursuant to this subsection. The office
204 of the attorney general of the state of Missouri shall bring
205 suit in the circuit court of the county in which the
206 accident occurred against any employer not covered by this
207 chapter as required in section 287.280.
208 8. Every year the second injury fund shall have an
209 actuarial study made to determine the solvency of the fund
210 taking into consideration any existing balance carried
211 forward from a previous year, appropriate funding level of
212 the fund, and forecasted expenditures from the fund. The
213 first actuarial study shall be completed prior to July 1,
214 2014. The expenses of such actuarial studies shall be paid
215 out of the fund for the support of the division of workers'
216 compensation.
217 9. The director of the division of workers'
218 compensation shall maintain the financial data and records
219 concerning the fund for the support of the division of
220 workers' compensation and the second injury fund. The
221 division shall also compile and report data on claims made
222 pursuant to subsection 11 of this section. The attorney
223 general shall provide all necessary information to the
224 division for this purpose.

SB 1385 39
225 10. All claims for fees and expenses filed against the
226 second injury fund and all records pertaining thereto shall
227 be open to the public.
228 11. Any employee who at the time a compensable work-
229 related injury is sustained prior to January 1, 2014, is
230 employed by more than one employer, the employer for whom
231 the employee was working when the injury was sustained shall
232 be responsible for wage loss benefits applicable only to the
233 earnings in that employer's employment and the injured
234 employee shall be entitled to file a claim against the
235 second injury fund for any additional wage loss benefits
236 attributed to loss of earnings from the employment or
237 employments where the injury did not occur, up to the
238 maximum weekly benefit less those benefits paid by the
239 employer in whose employment the employee sustained the
240 injury. The employee shall be entitled to a total benefit
241 based on the total average weekly wage of such employee
242 computed according to subsection 8 of section 287.250. The
243 employee shall not be entitled to a greater rate of
244 compensation than allowed by law on the date of the injury.
245 The employer for whom the employee was working where the
246 injury was sustained shall be responsible for all medical
247 costs incurred in regard to that injury.
248 12. No compensation shall be payable from the second
249 injury fund if the employee files a claim for compensation
250 under the workers' compensation law of another state with
251 jurisdiction over the employee's injury or accident or
252 occupational disease.
253 13. Notwithstanding the requirements of section
254 287.470, the life payments to an injured employee made from
255 the fund shall be suspended when the employee is able to
256 obtain suitable gainful employment or be self-employed in

SB 1385 40
257 view of the nature and severity of the injury. The division
258 shall promulgate rules setting forth a reasonable standard
259 means test to determine if such employment warrants the
260 suspension of benefits.
261 14. All awards issued under this chapter affecting the
262 second injury fund shall be subject to the provisions of
263 this chapter governing review and appeal.
264 15. The division shall pay any liabilities of the fund
265 in the following priority:
266 (1) Expenses related to the legal defense of the fund
267 under subsection 4 of this section;
268 (2) Permanent total disability awards in the order in
269 which claims are settled or finally adjudicated;
270 (3) Permanent partial disability awards in the order
271 in which such claims are settled or finally adjudicated;
272 (4) Medical expenses incurred prior to July 1, 2012,
273 under subsection 7 of this section; and
274 (5) Interest on unpaid awards.
275 Such liabilities shall be paid to the extent the fund has a
276 positive balance. Any unpaid amounts shall remain an
277 ongoing liability of the fund until satisfied.
278 16. Post-award interest for the purpose of second
279 injury fund claims shall be set at the adjusted rate of
280 interest established by the director of revenue pursuant to
281 section 32.065 or five percent, whichever is greater.
282 17. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 15 of
283 this section to the contrary, the division may pay from the
284 second injury fund any of the following second injury fund
285 liabilities prior to those liabilities listed under
286 subsection 15 of this section:

SB 1385 41
287 (1) All death benefits incurred under subsection 7 of
288 this section relating to claims for deaths occurring prior
289 to January 1, 2014, consistent with a temporary or final
290 award; and
291 (2) Ongoing medical expenses, but not past medical
292 expenses, under subsection 7 of this section relating to
293 claims for injuries occurring prior to January 1, 2014,
294 consistent with a temporary or final award that includes
295 future medical benefits.
287.240. If the injury causes death, either with or
without disability, the compensation therefor shall be as
provided in this section:
(1) In all cases the employer shall pay direct to the
persons furnishing the same the reasonable expense of the
burial of the deceased employee not exceeding five thousand
dollars. But no person shall be entitled to compensation
for the burial expenses of a deceased employee unless he or
she has furnished the same by authority of the widow or
widower, the nearest relative of the deceased employee in
the county of his or her death, his or her personal
representative, or the employer, who shall have the right to
give the authority in the order named. All fees and charges
under this section shall be fair and reasonable, shall be
subject to regulation by the division or the commission and
shall be limited to such as are fair and reasonable for
similar service to persons of a like standard of living.
The division or the commission shall also have jurisdiction
to hear and determine all disputes as to the charges. If
the deceased employee leaves no dependents, the death
benefit in this subdivision provided shall be the limit of
the liability of the employer under this chapter on account
of the death, except as herein provided for burial expenses

SB 1385 42
and except as provided in section 287.140; provided that in
all cases when the employer admits or does not deny
liability for the burial expense, it shall be paid within
thirty days after written notice, that the service has been
rendered, has been delivered to the employer. The notice
may be sent by registered mail, return receipt requested, or
may be made by personal delivery;
(2) The employer shall also pay to the dependents of
the employee a death benefit based on the employee's average
weekly [earnings during the year immediately preceding the
injury that results in the death of the employee,] wage as
provided in section 287.250. The amount of compensation for
death, which shall be paid in installments in the same
manner that compensation is required to be paid under this
chapter, shall be computed as follows:
(a) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after September 28, 1983, but before September 28, 1986,
the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-
six and two-thirds percent of the employee's average weekly
earnings during the year immediately preceding the injury;
provided that the weekly compensation paid under this
paragraph shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy
percent of the state average weekly wage, as such wage is
determined by the division of employment security, as of the
July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(b) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after September 28, 1986, but before August 28, 1990, the
weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of the employee's average weekly
earnings during the year immediately preceding the injury;
provided that the weekly compensation paid under this
paragraph shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy-five

SB 1385 43
percent of the state average weekly wage, as such wage is
determined by the division of employment security, as of the
July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(c) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after August 28, 1990, but before August 28, 1991, the
weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of the injured employee's average
weekly earnings as of the date of the injury; provided that
the weekly compensation paid under this paragraph shall not
exceed an amount equal to one hundred percent of the state
average weekly wage;
(d) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after August 28, 1991, the weekly compensation shall be
an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the
injured employee's average weekly earnings as of the date of
the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid under
this paragraph shall not exceed an amount equal to one
hundred five percent of the state average weekly wage;
(e) If the injury which caused the death occurred on
or after September 28, 1981, the weekly compensation shall
in no event be less than forty dollars per week;
(3) The word "dependent" as used in this chapter shall
mean:
(a) A wife upon a husband with whom she lives or who
is legally liable for her support, and a husband upon a wife
with whom he lives or who is legally liable for his support;
provided that on the death or remarriage of a widow or
widower, the death benefit shall cease unless there be other
dependents entitled to any death benefits under this
chapter. In the event of remarriage, a lump sum payment
equal in amount to the benefits due for a period of two
years shall be paid to the widow or widower. Thereupon the

SB 1385 44
periodic death benefits shall cease unless there are other
dependents entitled to any death benefit under this chapter,
in which event the periodic benefits to which such widow or
widower would have been entitled had he or she not died or
remarried shall be divided among such other dependents and
paid to them during their period of entitlement under this
chapter; or
(b) A natural, posthumous, or adopted child or
children, whether legitimate or illegitimate, including any
stepchild claimable by the deceased on his or her federal
tax return at the time of injury, under the age of eighteen
years, or over that age if physically or mentally
100 incapacitated from wage earning, upon the parent legally
101 liable for the support or with whom he, she, or they are
102 living at the time of the death of the parent. In case
103 there is a wife or a husband mentally or physically
104 incapacitated from wage earning, dependent upon a wife or
105 husband, and a child or more than one child thus dependent,
106 the death benefit shall be divided among them in such
107 proportion as may be determined by the commission after
108 considering their ages and other facts bearing on the
109 dependency. In all other cases questions of the degree of
110 dependency shall be determined in accordance with the facts
111 at the time of the injury, and in such other cases if there
112 is more than one person wholly dependent the death benefit
113 shall be divided equally among them. The payment of death
114 benefits to a child or other dependent as provided in this
115 paragraph shall cease when the dependent dies, attains the
116 age of eighteen years, or becomes physically and mentally
117 capable of wage earning over that age, or until twenty-two
118 years of age if the child of the deceased is in attendance
119 and remains as a full-time student in any accredited

SB 1385 45
120 educational institution, or if at eighteen years of age the
121 dependent child is a member of the Armed Forces of the
122 United States on active duty; provided, however, that such
123 dependent child shall be entitled to compensation during
124 four years of full-time attendance at a fully accredited
125 educational institution to commence prior to twenty-three
126 years of age and immediately upon cessation of his or her
127 active duty in the Armed Forces, unless there are other
128 dependents entitled to the death benefit under this chapter;
129 (4) The division or the commission may, in its
130 discretion, order or award the share of compensation of any
131 such child to be paid to the parent, grandparent, or other
132 adult next of kin or conservator of the child for the
133 latter's support, maintenance and education, which order or
134 award upon notice to the parties may be modified from time
135 to time by the commission in its discretion with respect to
136 the person to whom shall be paid the amount of the order or
137 award remaining unpaid at the time of the modification;
138 (5) The payments of compensation by the employer in
139 accordance with the order or award of the division or the
140 commission shall discharge the employer from all further
141 obligations as to the compensation;
142 (6) All death benefits in this chapter shall be paid
143 in installments in the same manner as provided for
144 disability compensation;
145 (7) Every employer shall keep a record of the correct
146 names and addresses of the dependents of each of his or her
147 employees, and upon the death of an employee by accident
148 arising out of and in the course of his or her employment
149 shall so far as possible immediately furnish the division
150 with such names and addresses;

SB 1385 46
151 (8) Dependents receiving death benefits under the
152 provisions of this chapter shall annually report to the
153 division as to marital status in the case of a widow or
154 widower or age and physical or mental condition of a
155 dependent child. The division shall provide forms for the
156 making of such reports.
287.250. 1. Except as otherwise provided for in this
chapter, the method of computing an injured employee's
average weekly earnings which will serve as the basis for
compensation provided for in this chapter shall be as
follows:
(1) If the wages are fixed by the week, the amount so
fixed shall be the average weekly wage;
(2) If the wages are fixed by the month, the average
weekly wage shall be the monthly wage so fixed multiplied by
twelve and divided by fifty-two;
(3) If the wages are fixed by the year, the average
weekly wage shall be the yearly wage fixed divided by fifty-
two;
(4) If the wages were fixed by the day, hour, or by
the output of the employee, the average weekly wage shall be
computed by dividing by thirteen the wages earned while
actually employed by the employer in each of the last
thirteen calendar weeks immediately preceding the week in
which the employee was injured or if actually employed by
the employer for less than thirteen weeks, by the number of
calendar weeks, or any portion of a week, during which the
employee was actually employed by the employer. For
purposes of computing the average weekly wage pursuant to
this subdivision, absence of five regular or scheduled work
days, even if not in the same calendar week, shall be
considered as absence for a calendar week. If the employee

SB 1385 47
commenced employment on a day other than the beginning of a
calendar week, such calendar week and the wages earned
during such week shall be excluded in computing the average
weekly wage pursuant to this subdivision;
(5) If the employee has been employed less than two
calendar weeks immediately preceding the injury, the
employee's weekly wage shall be considered to be equivalent
to the average weekly wage prevailing in the same or similar
employment at the time of the injury, except if the employer
has agreed to a certain hourly wage, then the hourly wage
agreed upon multiplied by the number of weekly hours
scheduled shall be the employee's average weekly wage;
(6) If the hourly wage has not been fixed or cannot be
ascertained, or the employee earned no wage, the wage for
the purpose of calculating compensation shall be taken to be
the usual wage for similar services where such services are
rendered by paid employees of the employer or any other
employer;
(7) In computing the average weekly wage pursuant to
subdivisions (1) to (6) of this subsection, an employee
shall be considered to have been actually employed for only
those weeks in which labor is actually performed by the
employee for the employer and wages are actually paid by the
employer as compensation for such labor;
(8) For purposes of 8 CSR 50-2.010(8)(B), an
allegation of the average weekly wage in a claim for
compensation shall not be considered a statement of fact
deemed admitted if an answer to the claim for compensation
is not timely filed.
2. For purposes of this section, the term "gross
wages" includes, in addition to money payments for services
rendered, the reasonable value of board, rent, housing,

SB 1385 48
lodging or similar advance received from the employer,
except if such benefits continue to be provided during the
period of the disability, then the value of such benefits
shall not be considered in calculating the average weekly
wage of the employee. The term "wages", as used in this
section, includes the value of any gratuities received in
the course of employment from persons other than the
employer to the extent that such gratuities are reported for
income tax purposes. "Wages", as used in this section, does
not include fringe benefits such as retirement, pension,
health and welfare, life insurance, training, Social
Security or other employee or dependent benefit plan
furnished by the employer for the benefit of the employee.
Any wages paid to helpers or any money paid by the employer
to the employee to cover any special expenses incurred by
the employee because of the nature of his employment shall
not be included in wages.
3. If an employee is hired by the employer for less
than the number of hours per week needed to be classified as
a full-time or regular employee, benefits computed for
purposes of this chapter for permanent partial disability,
permanent total disability and death benefits shall be based
upon the average weekly wage of a full-time or regular
employee engaged by the employer to perform work of the same
or similar nature and at the number of hours per week
required by the employer to classify the employee as a full-
time or regular employee, but such computation shall not be
based on less than thirty hours per week.
4. If pursuant to this section the average weekly wage
cannot fairly and justly be determined by the formulas
provided in subsections 1 to 3 of this section, the division
or the commission may determine the average weekly wage in

SB 1385 49
such manner and by such method as, in the opinion of the
division or the commission, based upon the exceptional facts
presented, fairly determine such employee's average weekly
wage.
5. In computing the compensation to be paid to an
employee, who, before the injury for which the employee
claims compensation, was disabled and drawing compensation
under the provisions of this chapter, the compensation for
each subsequent injury shall be apportioned according to the
100 proportion of incapacity and disability caused by the
101 respective injuries which the employee may have suffered.
102 6. For purposes of establishing a rate of compensation
103 applicable only to permanent partial disability, permanent
104 total disability and death benefits, pursuant to this
105 chapter, the average weekly wage for an employee who is
106 under the age of twenty-one years shall be adjusted to take
107 into consideration the increased earning power of such
108 employee until she or he attains the age of twenty-one years
109 and the average weekly wage for an employee who is an
110 apprentice or a trainee, and whose earnings would reasonably
111 be expected to increase, shall be adjusted to reflect a
112 level of expected increase, based upon completion of
113 apprenticeship or traineeship, provided that such adjustment
114 of the average weekly wage shall not consider expected
115 increase for a period occurring more than three years after
116 the date of the injury.
117 7. In all cases in which it is found by the division
118 or the commission that the employer knowingly employed a
119 minor in violation of the child labor laws of this state, a
120 fifty percent additional compensation shall be allowed.
121 8. For an employee with multiple employments, as to
122 the employee's entitlement to any temporary total or

SB 1385 50
123 temporary partial disability benefits only pursuant to
124 subsection 9 of section 287.220, and for no other purposes,
125 the employee's total average weekly wage shall be equal to
126 the sum of the total of the average weekly wage computed
127 separately for each employment pursuant to the provisions of
128 this section to which the employee is unable to return
129 because of this injury.
130 9. The parties, by agreement and with approval of an
131 administrative law judge, legal advisor or the commission,
132 may enter into a compromise lump sum settlement in either
133 permanent total or permanent partial disability cases which
134 prorates the lump sum settlement over the life expectancy of
135 the injured worker. When such an agreement has been
136 approved, neither the weekly compensation rate paid
137 throughout the case nor the maximum statutory weekly rate
138 applicable to the injury shall apply. No compensation rate
139 shall exceed the maximum statutory weekly rate as of the
140 date of the injury. Instead, the prorated rate set forth in
141 the approved settlement documents shall control and become
142 the rate for that case. This section shall be retroactive
143 in effect.
287.300. If [the] an employer [is] has not insured
[his] its liability hereunder, its liability shall be
primary and direct. If [he is] insured [his], its liability
shall be secondary and indirect, and [his] its insurer shall
be primarily and directly liable hereunder to the injured
employee, his or her dependents or other persons entitled to
rights hereunder. On the request of the division or the
commission and at every hearing the employer shall produce
and furnish it with a copy of his policy of insurance, and
on demand the employer shall furnish the injured employee,
or his dependents, with the correct name and address of his

SB 1385 51
insurer, and his failure to do so shall be prima facie
evidence of his failure to insure, but the presumption shall
be conclusively rebutted by an entry of appearance of his
insurer. Both the employer and his insurer shall be parties
to all agreements or awards of compensation, but the same
shall not be enforceable against the employer, except on
motion and proof of default by the insurer. Service on the
employer shall be sufficient to give the division or the
commission jurisdiction over the person of both the employer
and his insurer, and the appearance of the employer in any
proceeding shall also constitute the appearance of his
insurer, provided that after appearance by an insurer, the
insurer shall be entitled to notice of all proceedings
hereunder.
287.420. No proceedings for compensation for any
accident under this chapter shall be maintained unless
written notice of the time, place and nature of the injury,
and the name and address of the person injured, has been
given to the employer no later than thirty days after the
accident, unless the employer was not prejudiced by failure
to receive the notice. No proceedings for compensation for
any occupational disease or repetitive trauma under this
chapter shall be maintained unless written notice of the
time, place, and nature of the injury, and the name and
address of the person injured, has been given to the
employer no later than thirty days after the [diagnosis of
the condition] injury becomes "reasonably discoverable and
apparent" defined as being when employee knew or should have
known his or her injury was related to his or her employment
unless the employee can prove the employer was not
prejudiced by failure to receive the notice.

SB 1385 52
287.430. Except for a claim for recovery filed against
the second injury fund, no proceedings for compensation
under this chapter shall be maintained unless a claim
therefor is filed with the division within two years after
the date of injury or death, or the last payment made under
this chapter on account of the injury or death, except that
if the report of the injury or the death is not filed by the
employer as required by section 287.380, the claim for
compensation may be filed within three years after the date
of injury, death, or last payment made under this chapter on
account of the injury or death. The filing of any form,
report, receipt, or agreement, other than a claim for
compensation, shall not toll the running of the periods of
limitation provided in this section. The filing of the
report of injury or death three years or more after the date
of injury, death, or last payment made under this chapter on
account of the injury or death, shall not toll the running
of the periods of limitation provided in this section, nor
shall such filing reactivate or revive the period of time in
which a claim may be filed. A claim against the second
injury fund shall be filed [within two years after the date
of the injury or within one year after a claim is filed
against an employer or insurer pursuant to this chapter,
whichever is later] at any point prior to the conclusion by
settlement or final award, after appeals, of the primary
claim. In all other respects the limitations shall be
governed by the law of civil actions other than for the
recovery of real property, but the appointment of a
conservator shall be deemed the termination of the legal
disability from minority or disability as defined in chapter
475. The statute of limitations contained in this section
is one of extinction and not of repose.

SB 1385 53
287.480. 1. If an application for review is made to
the commission within twenty days from the date of the award
by any party, all parties to the case are automatically
retained as a party or parties to the appeal; the full
commission, if the first hearing was not held before the
full commission, shall review the evidence, or, if
considered advisable, as soon as practicable hear the
parties at issue, their representatives and witnesses and
shall make an award and file it in like manner as specified
in section 287.470. Any notice of appeal, application or
other paper required under this law to be filed with the
division or the commission shall, when mailed to or
transmitted by electronic facsimile meeting the requirements
of the division and received by the division or the
commission, be deemed to be filed as of the date endorsed by
the United States post office on the envelope or container
in which such paper is received, or the date received if
filed by facsimile. In instances where the last day for the
filing of any such paper falls on a Sunday or legal holiday,
the filing shall be deemed timely if accomplished on the
next day subsequent which is neither a Sunday or a legal
holiday. When filing by electronic facsimile meeting the
requirements of the division, the parties shall, on the same
date as the facsimile transmission, mail by the United
States mail the original and the requisite number of copies
to the commission. In addition, the commission may allow
filing of applications for review, briefs, motions, and
other requests for relief with the commission by electronic
means, in such manner as the commission may, by regulation,
prescribe.
2. An employer who has been determined by the division
to be an employer subject to and operating pursuant to this

SB 1385 54
chapter and has also been determined to be uninsured may
file an application for review but such application for
review shall be accompanied with and attached to the
application for review a bond which shall be conditioned for
the satisfaction of the award in full, and if for any reason
the appeal is dismissed or if the award is affirmed or
modified, to satisfy in full such modification of the award
as the commission may award. The surety on such bond shall
be a bank, savings and loan institution or an insurance
company licensed to do business in the state of Missouri.
No appeal to the commission shall be considered filed unless
accompanied by such bond and such bond shall also be a
prerequisite for appeal as provided in section 287.495 and
such appeal pursuant to section 287.495 shall not be
considered filed unless accompanied by such bond. If any
other employer pursuant to section 287.040 would be liable,
the employee shall be paid benefits from the bond until the
bond is exhausted before the section 287.040 employer is
required to pay.
287.510. In any case a temporary or partial award of
compensation may be made, and the same may be modified from
time to time to meet the needs of the case, and the same may
be kept open until a final award can be made, and if the
same be not complied with, the amount equal to the value of
compensation ordered and unpaid may be doubled in the final
award, if the final award shall be in accordance with the
temporary or partial award. The appellate court shall have
jurisdiction to review a temporary or partial award of
compensation on the issue of the employer's liability where
an employer claims it is not liable for paying any
compensation and is disputing all liability.

SB 1385 55
287.540. [On notice to the other] By agreement of the
parties, the commission [or court] may permit the employer
to be discharged from further liability under any agreement,
award or judgment for compensation by furnishing to the
person entitled thereto an annuity or other obligation,
approved by the commission [or court], by which payment is
assumed by some responsible person[, or by depositing the
commutable value thereof with the commission to be disbursed
to the persons entitled thereto in such manner as the
commission shall determine] or entity. The basis for
approval of any such settlement shall be the same as
provided for in settlements under section 287.390.
287.780. No employer or agent shall discharge or
discriminate against any employee for exercising any of his
or her rights under this chapter when the exercising of such
rights is the motivating factor in the discharge or
discrimination. Any employee who has been discharged or
discriminated against in such manner shall have a civil
action for damages against his or her employer. For
purposes of this section, "motivating factor" shall mean
that the employee's exercise of his or her rights under this
chapter actually played a role in the discharge or
discrimination and had a determinative influence on the
discharge or discrimination. An offer of settlement of a
worker's compensation case made contingent upon a voluntary
resignation of employment is not evidence that can be used
in any civil action brought under this section.
[287.530. 1. The compensation provided in
this chapter may be commuted by the division or
the commission and redeemed by the payment in
whole or in part, by the employer, of a lump sum
which shall be fixed by the division or the
commission, which sum shall be equal to the

SB 1385 56
commutable value of the future installments
which may be due under this chapter, taking
account of life contingencies, the payment to be
commuted at its present value upon application
of either party, with due notice to the other,
if it appears that the commutation will be for
the best interests of the employee or the
dependents of the deceased employee, or that it
will avoid undue expense or undue hardship to
either party, or that the employee or dependent
has removed or is about to remove from the
United States or that the employer has sold or
otherwise disposed of the greater part of his
business or assets.
2. In determining whether the commutation
asked for will be for the best interest of the
employee or the dependents of the deceased
employee, or so that it will avoid undue expense
or undue hardship to either party, the division
or the commission will constantly bear in mind
that it is the intention of this chapter that
the compensation payments are in lieu of wages
and are to be received by the injured employee
or his dependents in the same manner in which
wages are ordinarily paid. Therefore,
commutation is a departure from the normal
method of payment and is to be allowed only when
it clearly appears that some unusual
circumstances warrant such a departure.]
✓